Utah statutes.
34A-6-108.   Collection, compilation, and analysis of statistics.

(1)  The division shall develop and maintain an effective program of collection, compilation, and analysis of occupational safety and health statistics.  The program may cover all employments whether subject to this chapter but may not cover employments excluded by Subsection 34A-6-104(2).  The division shall compile accurate statistics on work injuries and occupational diseases.

(2)  The division may use the functions imposed by Subsection (1) to:

(a)  promote, encourage, or directly engage in programs of studies, information, and communication concerning occupational safety and health statistics;

(b)  assist agencies or political subdivisions in developing and administering programs dealing with occupational safety and health statistics; and

(c)  arrange, through assistance, for the conduct of research and investigations which give promise of furthering the objectives of this section.

(3)  The division may, with the consent of any state agency or political subdivision of the state, accept and use the services, facilities, and employees of state agencies or political subdivisions of the state, with or without reimbursement, to assist it in carrying out its functions under this section.

(4)  On the basis of the records made and kept under Subsection 34A-6-301(3), employers shall file reports with the division in the form and manner prescribed by the division.

(5)  Agreements between the United States Department of Labor and Utah pertaining to the collection of occupational safety and health statistics already in effect on July 1, 1973, remain in effect until superseded.

